src/fst/lexicon.tmp.lexc
LEXICON VTIm_PL_CNJ_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !intentional


!!! PERSON

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -t final verbs (refers to the stem ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================


LEXICON VTIm_IND_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NI@ VTIm_IND_NI ;
@U.person.KI@ VTIm_IND_KI ;
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_IND_NULL ;

LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_CNJ_NULL ;

LEXICON VTIm_FUT_CON_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL ;

LEXICON VTIm_IMP_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_IMP_NULL ;

LEXICON VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.person.NI@ VTIm_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.KI@ VTIm_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VTIm_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VTIm_PL_IMP_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

!!! SUFFIXES

! *********************
!!!! INDEPENDENT !!!!
! *********************


! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -t final verbs (refers to the stem ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================


LEXICON VTIm_IND_NI   !!= @CODE@  
VTIm_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VTIm_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 
+1Sg:%>n2 VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VTIm_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 
+1Pl:%>n2ân VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VTIm_IND_KI   !!= @CODE@  
VTIm_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VTIm_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 
+2Sg:%>n2 VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VTIm_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 
+12Pl:%>n2aw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>n2ânaw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>n2âwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VTIm_IND_NULL   !!= @CODE@  
VTIm_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VTIm_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ NOTE: X actor will eventually derive to VII, so it is not yet included as per Arok's paradigm
+3Sg:%>m VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

+Der/X:%>ikâtê VIIn_SG ; !! Derives to VIIn



LEXICON VTIm_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 
+3Pl:%>mwak VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>miyiwa VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

+Der/X:%>ikâtê VIIn_PL ; !! Derives to VIIn
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================


! ******************
!!!! CONJUNCT !!!!
! ******************

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -t final verbs (refers to the stem ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================


LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_NULL   !!= @CODE@ 

VTIm_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 

+1Sg:%>mân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>man VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>hk VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

+X+3Sg:%>mihk VERB_ENDLEX ;
!! +X+4Sg:%>mihiyik # ;

LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 

+1Pl:%>mâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>mahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>mêk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>hkik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>miyit VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

+X+3Sg:%>mihki VERB_ENDLEX ;
!! +X+4Pl:%>mihiyiki # ;

! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================


! ********************
!!!! IMPERATIVE !!!!
! ********************

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -t final verbs (refers to the stem ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================


LEXICON VTIm_IMP_NULL
VTIm_IMP_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VTIm_IMP_SG_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg:%>0   VERB_ENDLEX ; ! 
+Del+2Sg:%>môhkan   VERB_ENDLEX ; !


LEXICON VTIm_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+Imm+12Pl:%>tân	  VERB_ENDLEX ; ! ! <a> to <ê> / _ %>tân
+Imm+2Pl:%>mok	 VERB_ENDLEX ; !
+Del+12Pl:%>môhkahk   VERB_ENDLEX ; !
+Del+2Pl:%>môhkêk   VERB_ENDLEX ; !


! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================


! ****************************
!!!! FUTURE CONDITIONAL !!!!
! ****************************

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -t final verbs (refers to the stem ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================


LEXICON VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL   !!= @CODE@ 

VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 

+1Sg:%>mâni VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>mani VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>hki VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

+X:%>mihki VERB_ENDLEX ;
!! +X+4Sg:%>mihiyiki # ;

LEXICON VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 

+1Pl:%>mâhki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>mahko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>mahki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>mêko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>hkwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>miyici VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

!! +X+3Sg:%>mihkwâwi # ;
!! +X+4Sg:%>mihiyikwâwi # ;

! !! !!! Transitive inanimate (TA)
! !      ===========================
! !      ===========================
!!!@@@!!! SG/PL ALWAYS LISTED UNDER THE SINGULAR CONT.LEX

!!! AEW == Ours: VTA1, VTA2, VTA 3, VTA 4 == VTA (We also have plural only lexica), VTA5 == VTAi

!!! STEM CLASS

LEXICON VTA  !!= * @CODE@ Multi-Syllabic stems 
+V+TA:0 VTA_WICI ;

LEXICON VTA_PL  !!= * @CODE@ Multi-Syllabic stems plural only forms
+V+TA:0 VTA_PL_WICI ;

LEXICON VTAt  !!= * @CODE@ Multi-Syllabic t/s-final alternating stems
+V+TA:0 VTAt_WICI ;

LEXICON VTAi  !!= * @CODE@ Mono-Syllabic stems
+V+TA:0 VTAi_WICI ;


!!! WICI !!= * @CODE@ -RULES OUT TAs FROM TAKING THE COM.


LEXICON VTA_WICI  !!= * @CODE@ -Vw stem-ending verbs; where + i suf deletes w and i
@U.wici.NULL@ VTA_ORDER ;

LEXICON VERBSTEMS
ahêw:ah VTAi ;
akotêw:akot3 VTAt ;
akwahpitamawêw:akwahpitamaw VTA ;
apihkâtamawêw:apihkâtamaw VTAt ;
asêskawêw:asêskaw VTA ;
asicâpâtêw:asicâpât3 VTAt ;
aspatotêw:aspatot3 VTAt ;
astâhikow:astâh VTA ;
atotêw:atot3 VTAt ;
ay-itêw:ay-it3 VTAi ;
ayamihâhtahêw:ayamihâhtah VTA ;
âcimostamawêw:âcimostamaw VTA ;
âciwipotêw:âciwipot3 VTAt ;
âhtahpitêw:âhtahpit3 VTAt ;
âkwahwêw:âkwahw VTA ;
âniskamâtêw:âniskamât3 VTAt ;
âsipitêw:âsipit3 VTAt ;
âsowahamawêw:âsowahamaw VTA ;
âwatêw:âwat3 VTAt ;
âyîtawahêw:âyîtawah VTA ;
cimipitêw:cimipit3 VTAt ;
cimisihêw:cimisih VTA ;
cîsâwâtêw:cîsâwât3 VTAt ;
cîstanihkwanâtêw:cîstanihkwanât3 VTAt ;
isikwâtêw:isikwât3 VTAt ;
isinawêw:isinaw VTA ;
iskosâwâtêw:iskosâwât3 VTAt ;
ispitêw:ispit3 VTAt ;
itaskihêw:itaskih VTA ;
itêw:it3 VTAi ;
itôtamawêw:itôtamaw VTA ;
iyiniwihkâtêw:iýiniwihkât3 VTAt ;
kakêhtawêyimêw:kakêhtawêýim VTA ;
kanawêyihtamawêw:kanawêýihtamaw VTA ;
kaskâwikanênêw:kaskâwikanên VTA ;
kaskêyihtamaskatêw:kaskêýihtamaskat3 VTAt ;
kawipahêw:kawipah VTA ;
kawipitêw:kawipit3 VTAt ;
kâsîhamawêw:kâsîhamaw VTA ;
kâskipitêw:kâskipit3 VTAt ;
kêcikwâpitêpitêw:kêcikwâpitêpit3 VTAt ;
kêtaskisinêpitêw:kêtaskisinêpit3 VTAt ;
kêtayiwinisênêw:kêtayiwinisên VTA ;
kipatâmoskawêw:kipatâmoskaw VTA ;
kipocâpiwahpitêw:kipocâpiwahpit3 VTAt ;
kisânêswêw:kisânêsw VTA ;
kisâtêw:kisât3 VTAt ;
kisîpêkisitênêw:kisîpêkisitên VTA ;
kistikâtêw:kistikât3 VTAt ;
kitahamawêw:kitahamaw VTA ;
kiyâmikâpawîstawêw:kiyâmikâpawîstaw VTA ;
kîhkâspitêw:kîhkâspit3 VTAt ;
kîkisêpâ-mowêw:kîkisêpâ-mow VTA ;
kînikohkotêw:kînikohkot3 VTAt ;
kîpipitêw:kîpipit3 VTAt ;
kîsitêpohêw:kîsitêpoh VTA ;
kîskihkotêw:kîskihkot3 VTAt ;
kîskwêhêw:kîskwêh VTA ;
kîspinatêw:kîspinat3 VTAt ;
kohcipayihêw:kohcipaýih VTA ;
kotahâskwâtêw:kotahâskwât3 VTAt ;
kotâwinêw:kotâwin VTA ;
kwayâtahêw:kwayâtah VTA ;
kwêskipitêw:kwêskipit3 VTAt ;
kwêskosîtotawêw:kwêskosîtotaw VTA ;
mamihcimêw:mamihcim VTA ;
manitôhkâtêw:manitôhkât3 VTAt ;
masaskocihcênêw:masaskocihcên VTA ;
mawinêhwêw:mawinêhw VTA ;
mawiswâtêw:mawiswât3 VTAt ;
mâmaskâcihtawêw:mâmaskâcihtaw VTA ;
mâmawohkawêwak:mâmawohkaw VTA_PL ;
mâwasakokwâtêw:mâwasakokwât3 VTAt ;
mâwasakotisahwêw:mâwasakotisahw VTA ;
mêstahpinatêw:mêstahpinat VTA ;
mêstasîhkawêwak:mêstasîhkaw VTA_PL ;
mêstaskatêw:mêstaskat3 VTAt ;
mihcêtohkamawêwak:mihcêtohkamaw VTA_PL ;
mikosiskâcihêw:mikosiskâcih VTA ;
mimikopitêw:mimikopit3 VTAt ;
miskawêw:miskaw VTA ;
miyo-wâhkômêw:miýo-wâhkôm VTA ;
mîtitêw:mîtit3 VTAt ;
mohtâskikanêhwêw:mohtâskikanêhw VTA ;
môskipitêw:môskipit3 VTAt ;
mwêstamêw:mwêstam VTA ;
nakatamawêw:nakatamaw VTA ;
nakwâtêw:nakwât3 VTAt ;
nanâtawihêw:nanâtawih VTA ;
napwahpitêw:napwahpit3 VTAt ;
naspâcinawêw:naspâcinaw VTA ;
nawênêw:nawên VTA ;
nânistipitêw:nânistipit3 VTAt ;
nâsipêhtahêw:nâsipêhtah VTA ;
nêstoskawêw:nêstoskaw VTA ;
nihtâwikwâtêw:nihtâwikwât3 VTAt ;
nistâsihkawêw:nistâsihkaw VTA ;
nîhtowatênêw:nîhtowatên VTA ;
nîsôhkawêwak:nîsôhkaw VTA_PL ;
nîswahpitêw:nîswahpit3 VTAt ;
nôcîhkamawêw:nôcîhkamaw VTA ;
ohpâpêkipitêw:ohpâpêkipit3 VTAt ;
osâwihêw:osâwih VTA ;
oyasiwâtêw:oýasiwât3 VTAt ;
pahpawisimêw:pahpawisim VTA ;
pakwâtêw:pakwât3 VTAt ;
paskamêw:paskam VTA ;
patahohkâtêw:patahohkât3 VTAt ;
pâskinamawêw:pâskinamaw VTA ;
pêcipitêw:pêcipit3 VTAt ;
pikohkwêswêw:pikohkwêsw VTA ;
pimotêw:pimot3 VTAt ;
pîhtokawêw:pîhtokaw VTA ;
pîhtokêpitêw:pîhtokêpit3 VTAt ;
pîmikwâtêw:pîmikwât3 VTAt ;
postamôhêw:postamôh VTA ;
pôtâtêw:pôtât3 VTAt ;
sasciwihêw:sasciwih VTA ;
sawohkâtêw:sawohkât3 VTAt ;
sikatêyimêw:sikatêýim VTA ;
sikitêw:sikit3 VTAt ;
sîhtwahpitêw:sîhtwahpit3 VTAt ;
sînihkomêhêw:sînihkomêh VTA ;
tahcipitêw:tahcipit3 VTAt ;
takotisahwêw:takotisahw VTA ;
tapahtakotêw:tapahtakot3 VTAt ;
tâskihkotêw:tâskihkot3 VTAt ;
têhamawêw:têhamaw VTA ;
tipikwâtêw:tipikwât3 VTAt ;
tôtawêw:tôtaw VTA ;
wayahpitêw:wayahpit3 VTAt ;
wâpiskihêw:wâpiskih VTA ;
wâsakâpîstawêwak:wâsakâpîstaw VTA_PL ;
wâsakâskawêwak:wâsakâskaw VTA_PL ;
wâtihkâtêw:wâtihkât3 VTAt ;
wiyahpitêw:wiýahpit3 VTAt ;
wiyiswêw:wiýisw VTA ;
wîhkwêkâpawîstawêwak:wîhkwêkâpawîstaw VTA_PL ;
wînispitêw:wînispit3 VTAt ;
wîsakamêw:wîsakam VTA ;
yâyikisâwâtêw:ýâýikisâwât3 VTAt ;
